src/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
!! Pronouns
!  --------
!! Denesųłine Pronouns 

LEXICON Pronouns
si+Pron+Pers+1Sg:si # ;
si+Pron+Pers+1Sg:sį # ;
nen+Pron+Pers+2Sg:nen # ;
nen+Pron+Pers+2Sg:nɛn # ;
nen+Pron+Pers+2Sg:nën # ;
ʔedini+Pron+Dem+Sem/Hum+Sg:ʔedini # ;
ʔedini+Pron+Dem+Sem/Hum+Sg:ʔedëne # ;
